Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall contract with an  Oregon-based
nonprofit organization with the expertise to operate a 24-hour call center dedicated  to
tracking and providing information about available placement settings for  children and ado-
lescents needing high acuity behavioral health services.
(2) The call center shall also be responsible for:
(a) Implementing processes for service providers  to submit data that can be used to as-
sess and monitor, on  a daily basis, statewide capacity to provide high acuity behavioral
health services to children and adolescents;
(b) Recording the time from the first contact with  the call center to the location of an
appropriate placement; and
(c) Documenting the need for high acuity behavioral health services for children and
adolescents.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the
General Fund, the  amount of $400,000, which may be expended for carrying out section 1 of
this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 944 (SB 944-B) Page 1
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 944 (SB 944-B) Page 2